Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1726
Forms of articles and bylaws.

In order to simplify the organization of credit unions, the director shall cause to be prepared an approved form of articles of association and a suggested form of bylaws, consistent with the Credit Union Act, which may be used by credit union subscribers as a guide. Upon written application of any nine individuals residing in the state, the director shall supply such individuals, without charge, one approved form of the articles of association and one suggested form of bylaws.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 26.